nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Cricket: Cricketbager; Cricketballer; Tilbehør til cricketballtrær; Cricketballtrær; Cricketklær og uniformer; Utstyrssett for cricket; Beskyttelsesutstyr for cricket; Tilbehør til cricketsko; Cricketsko; Cricketstumper; Treningsutstyr for cricket; Mini-cricketballtrær
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 板球用品: 板球包; 板球; 板球拍配件; 板球拍; 板球服饰与队服; 板球装备套装; 板球护具; 板球鞋配件; 板球鞋; 板球门柱; 板球训练辅助用品; 迷你板球拍
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng gậy: Túi đựng đồ cricket; Quả bóng gậy; Phụ kiện gậy bóng gậy; Gậy đánh bóng gậy; Trang phục và đồng phục cricket; Bộ thiết bị bóng gậy; Dụng cụ bảo vệ để chơi bóng gậy; Phụ kiện giày cricket; Giày chơi bóng gậy; Cọc gôn bóng gậy; Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập bóng gậy; Gậy cricket mini
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Κρίκετ: Τσάντες κρίκετ; Μπάλες κρίκετ; Αξεσουάρ μπαστουνιών κρίκετ; Μπαστούνια κρίκετ; Ένδυση και στολές κρίκετ; Σετ εξοπλισμού κρίκετ; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός κρίκετ; Αξεσουάρ παπουτσιών κρίκετ; Παπούτσια κρίκετ; Στύλοι κρίκετ; Εκπαιδευτικός εξοπλισμός κρίκετ; Μίνι ρόπαλα κρίκετ
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > クリケット: クリケット用バッグ; クリケットボール; クリケットバット関連用品; クリケットバット; クリケット用ウェア・ユニフォーム; クリケット用品セット; クリケット用プロテクター; クリケット用シューズアクセサリー; クリケットシューズ; クリケットスタンプ; クリケット練習器具; ミニクリケットバット
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Kricket: Cricket-Taschen; Cricketbälle; Cricketschläger-Zubehör; Cricketschläger; Cricket-Bekleidung & Uniformen; Cricket-Aussrüstungssets; Cricket-Schutzkleidung; Zubehör für Cricket-Schuhe; Cricket-Schuhe; Cricketstäbe; Cricket-Trainingshilfen; Mini-Cricket-Schläger
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Cricket: Crickettassen; Cricketballen; Accessoires voor cricketbats; Cricketbats; Kleding en uniformen voor cricket; Sets met cricketbenodigdheden; Beschermende uitrusting voor cricket; Accessoires voor cricketschoenen; Cricketschoenen; Cricketstumps; Crickettrainingshulpmiddelen; Mini-cricketbats
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Krykiet: Torby do krykieta; Piłki do krykieta; Akcesoria do kijów krykietowych; Kije do krykieta; Odzież i stroje do krykieta; Zestawy do gry w krykieta; Ochraniacze do krykieta; Akcesoria do butów do krykieta; Buty do krykieta; Słupki do bramek krykietowych; Pomoce treningowe do krykieta; Minikije do krykieta
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Крикет: Сумки для крикета; Мячи для крикета; Аксессуары для крикетных бит; Крикетные биты; Одежда и форма для крикета; Наборы инвентаря для крикета; Защитная экипировка для крикета; Аксессуары для обуви для крикета; Обувь для крикета; Столбики для калиток; Тренировочный инвентарь для крикета; Мини-биты для крикета
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Cricket: Cricket Bags; Cricket Balls; Cricket Bat Accessories; Cricket Bats; Cricket Clothing & Uniforms; Cricket Equipment Sets; Cricket Protective Gear; Cricket Shoe Accessories; Cricket Shoes; Cricket Stumps; Cricket Training Aids; Mini Cricket Bats
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Cricket: Borse da cricket; Palline da cricket; Accessori per mazze da cricket; Mazze da cricket; Abbigliamento e divise da cricket; Set di attrezzi per cricket; Protezioni per cricket; Accessori per scarpe da cricket; Scarpe da cricket; Pioli per cricket; Ausili per l'addestramento al cricket; Mini mazze da cricket
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 板球: 板球裝備袋; 板球用球; 板球球板配件; 板球球棒; 板球服裝與制服; 板球用具組; 板球護具; 板球鞋配件; 板球鞋; 板球柱門; 板球訓練輔助用具; 迷你板球球棒
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Крикет: Чанти за крикет; Топки за крикет; Аксесоари за бухалка за крикет; Бухалки за крикет; Дрехи и униформи за крикет; Комплекти екипировка за крикет; Защитна екипировка за крикет; Аксесоари за обувки за крикет; Обувки за крикет; Стълбове за крикет; Помощни средства за тренировка по крикет; Мини бухалки за крикет
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Kriket: Kriketové palice; Kriketové loptičky; Príslušenstvo pre kriketové palice; Kriketové palice; Oblečenie a uniformy na kriket; Súpravy kriketového vybavenia; Ochranné kriketové vybavenie; Príslušenstvo pre kriketové topánky; Kriketová obuv; Kriketové kolíky; Kriketové tréningové pomôcky; Mini pálky na kriket
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Cricket: Crickettasker; Cricketbolde; Tilbehør til cricketbat; Cricketbat; Crickettøj og -uniformer; Udstyrssæt til cricket; Beskyttelsesudstyr til cricket; Tilbehør til cricketsko; Cricketsko; Gærdepinde til cricket; Hjælpemidler til crickettræning; Mini-cricketbat
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Kriketti: Krikettikassit; Krikettipallot; Krikettimailan tarvikkeet; Krikettimailat; Krikettivaatteet ja -peliasut; Krikettivälinesetit; Krikettisuojat; Krikettikenkien lisävarusteet; Krikettikengät; Kriketin hilat; Kriketin harjoitteluvälineet; Minikrikettimailat
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Críquete: Sacos de críquete; Bolas de críquete; Acessórios para taco de críquete; Tacos de críquete; Vestuário e uniformes de críquete; Conjuntos de equipamento para críquete; Equipamento de proteção para críquete; Acessórios para calçado de críquete; Calçado de críquete; Postes de críquete; Auxiliares de treino para críquete; Mini bastões de críquete
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 크리켓: 크리켓 가방; 크리켓 공; 크리켓 배트 부대용품; 크리켓 배트; 크리켓 의류 및 유니폼; 크리켓 장비 세트; 크리켓 보호 장비; 크리켓화 액세서리; 크리켓화; 크리켓 스텀프; 크리켓 훈련 장비; 미니 크리켓 배트
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Crichet: Genți pentru cricket; Mingi de crichet; Accesorii pentru bâte de crichet; Bâte de crichet; Îmbrăcăminte și uniforme de cricket; Seturi de echipamente de crichet; Echipamente de protecție crichet; Accesorii pentru pantofi de cricket; Pantofi de cricket; Porți crichet; Articole pentru antrenament crichet; Minicrose de cricket
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Criquet: Sacs de cricket; Balles de cricket; Accessoires pour battes de cricket; Battes de cricket; Vêtements et uniformes de cricket; Ensembles d'équipements de cricket; Équipement de protection de cricket; Accessoires de chaussures de cricket; Chaussures de cricket; Souches de cricket; Aides à l'entraînement au cricket; Mini-battes de cricket
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Kriket: Kriket çantaları; Kriket Topları; Kriket Sopası Aksesuarları; Kriket Sopaları; Kriket giyim ve formaları; Kriket Malzeme Setleri; Kriket Koruyucu Kıyafetleri; Kriket ayakkabısı aksesuarları; Kriket Ayakkabıları; Kriket Kaleleri; Kriket Eğitim Araçları; Mini kriket sopaları
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Krikett: Kriketttáskák; Krikettlabdák; Krikettütő-kiegészítők; Krikettütők; Krikettruházat és egyenruhák; Krikettfelszerelés-készletek; Krikett védőfelszerelés; Krikettcipő-kiegészítők; Krikettcipők; Krikettkarók; Krikett-edzési segédeszközök; Mini krikettütők
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Kriket: Vreče za kriket; Žoge za kriket; Dodatki za loparje za kriket; Loparji za kriket; Oblačila in uniforme za kriket; Kompleti opreme za kriket; Zaščitna oprema za kriket; Dodatki za čevlje za kriket; Čevlji za kriket; Koli za kriket; Pripomočki za vadbo kriketa; Mini loparji za kriket
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Cricket: Cricketväskor; Cricketbollar; Slagträtillbehör för kricket; Cricketslagträn; Cricketkläder och dräkter; Utrustningsset för kricket; Skyddsutrustning för kricket; Tillbehör för cricketskor; Cricketskor; Grindpinnar för kricket; Hjälpmedel för cricket; Minicricketträn
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Cricket: Bolsos para críquet; Pelotas de cricket; Accesorios de bates de críquet; Bates de cricket; Ropa y uniformes de críquet; Conjuntos de equipamiento para críquet; Equipamiento de protección para críquet; Accesorios para zapatos de críquet; Calzado de cricket; Stumps para críquet; Ayudas para el entrenamiento de críquet; Minibates de críquet
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Kriket: Torbe za kriket; Lopte za kriket; Pribor za palice za kriket; Palice za kriket; Odjeća i uniforme za kriket; Setovi opreme za kriket; Zaštitna oprema za kriket; Dodaci za obuću za kriket; Obuća za kriket; Stupovi za kriket; Pomagala za trening kriketa; Mini palice za kriket
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Kriketas: Kriketo krepšiai; Kriketo kamuoliukai; Kriketo lazdų priedai; Kriketo lazdos; Kriketo apranga ir uniformos; Kriketo įrangos rinkiniai; Kriketo apsauginės priemonės; Kriketo batelių priedai; Kriketo bateliai; Kriketo varteliai; Kriketo treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės; Mini kriketo lazdos
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Críquete: Bolsas de críquete; Bolas de críquete; Acessórios para tacos de críquete; Tacos de críquete; Roupas e uniformes de críquete; Conjuntos de equipamento de críquete; Equipamento de proteção de críquete; Acessórios para calçados de críquete; Sapatos de críquete; Estacas de críquete; Auxílios de treinamento para críquete; Mini tacos de críquete
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Kriket: Tašky na kriket; Kriketové míčky; Kriketové pálky – příslušenství; Kriketové pálky; Kriketové oblečení a uniformy; Sady vybavení na kriket; Kriketové chrániče; Příslušenství ke kriketové obuvi; Boty na kriket; Kriketové tyčky; Tréninkové pomůcky na kriket; Mini kriketové pálky
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > คริกเก็ต: กระเป๋าคริกเกต; ลูกคริกเก็ต; อุปกรณ์ไม้ตีคริกเก็ต; ไม้ตีคริกเก็ต; เสื้อผ้าและชุดคริกเกต; ชุดอุปกรณ์คริกเก็ต; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันของคริกเก็ต; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับรองเท้าคริกเก็ต; รองเท้าคริกเก็ต; ไม้สามแท่งในกีฬาคริกเก็ต; อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมคริกเก็ต; ไม้ตีคริกเก็ตขนาดเล็ก